test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-1-wîcihîw_gt-norm.yaml
      # 12Pl
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO: ta-wîcihâthahk	# we and you help him/her
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO: ta-wîcihâthahkok	# we and you help them
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: ta-wîcihimâthahk	# we and you help another/others

      # 2Pl
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO: ta-wîcihithîk	# you all help me
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3SgO: ta-wîcihâthîk	# you all help him/her
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO: ta-wîcihithâhk	# you all help us
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO: ta-wîcihâthîkok	# you all help them
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: ta-wîcihimâthîk	# you all help another/others

      # 3Pl
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1SgO: ta-wîcihicik	# they help me
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2SgO: ta-wîcihiskik	# they help you
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO: ta-wîcihikothâhkik	# they help us
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO: ta-wîcihikothahkok	# they help you and us
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO: ta-wîcihikothîkok	# they help you all
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: ta-wîcihâcik	# they help another/others
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: ta-wîcihimâcik	# they help yet another/others

      # 4Sg/Pl
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: ta-wîcihimit	# another/others help me
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: ta-wîcihimisk	# another/others help you
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: ta-wîcihikot	# another/others help him/her
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: ta-wîcihikothâhk	# another/others help us
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: ta-wîcihikothahk	# another/others help you and us
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: ta-wîcihikothîk	# another/others help you all
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: ta-wîcihikocik	# another/others help them
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: ta-wîcihâthit	# another/others help yet another/others

      # 5Sg/Pl
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: ta-wîcihikothit	# yet another/others help another/others

      # X
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1SgO: ta-wîcihikawithân	# someone helps me
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2SgO: ta-wîcihikawithan	# someone helps you
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3SgO: ta-wîcihiht	# someone helps him/her
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1PlO: ta-wîcihikawithâhk	# someone helps us
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+12PlO: ta-wîcihikawithahk	# someone helps you and us
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2PlO: ta-wîcihikawithîk	# someone helps you all
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3PlO: ta-wîcihihcik	# someone helps them
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+4Sg/PlO: ta-wîcihimiht	# someone helps another/others

      # 0Sg/Pl
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1SgO: PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1SgO
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2SgO: PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2SgO
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3SgO: PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3SgO
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1PlO: PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1PlO
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+12PlO: PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+12PlO
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2PlO: PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2PlO
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3PlO: PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3PlO
      PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: PV/ta+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO
      

      # Fut # Cond

      # 1Sg
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2SgO: wîcihitâni	# when I help you
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3SgO: wîcihaki	# when I help him/her
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2PlO: wîcihitako	# when I help you all
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3PlO: wîcihakwâwi	# when I help them
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: wîcihimaki	# when I help another/others

      # 2Sg
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+1SgO: wîcihithani	# when you help me
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3SgO: wîcihaci	# when you help him/her
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+1PlO: wîcihithâhki	# when you help us
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3PlO: wîcihatwâwi	# when you help them
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: wîcihimaci	# when you help another/others

      # 3Sg
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+1SgO: wîcihithani	# when you help me
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+2SgO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+2SgO	# when you help you
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+1PlO: wîcihithâhki	# when you help us
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+12PlO: [wîcihikothahki, wîcihikothahko]	# when he/she helps you and us
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2PlO: wîcihikothîko	# when he/she helps you all
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3PlO: wîcihatwâwi	# when you help them
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: wîcihimaci	# when you help another/others
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: wîcihimâci	# when he/she helps yet another/others

      # 1Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+2SgO: wîcihitâhki	# when we help you
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3SgO: wîcihâthâhki	# when we help him/her
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+2PlO: wîcihitâhki	# when we help you all
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3PlO: wîcihâthâhkwâwi	# when we help them
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihimâthâhki	# when we help another/others

      # 12Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3SgO: [wîcihâthahki, wîcihâthahko]	# when we and you help him/her
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3PlO: wîcihâthahkwâwi	# when we and you help them
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wîcihimâthahki, wîcihimâthahko]	# when we and you help another/others

      # 2Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+1SgO: wîcihithîko	# when you all help me
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3SgO: wîcihâthîko	# when you all help him/her
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+1PlO: wîcihithâhki	# when you all help us
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3PlO: wîcihâthîkwâwi	# when you all help them
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihimâthîko	# when you all help another/others

      # 3Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1SgO: wîcihitwâwi	# when they help me
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2SgO: wîcihiskwâwi	# when they help you
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1PlO: wîcihikothâhkwâwi	# when they help us
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+12PlO: wîcihikothahkwâwi	# when they help you and us
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2PlO: wîcihikothîkwâwi	# when they help you all
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihâtwâwi	# when they help another/others
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: wîcihimâtwâwi	# when they help yet another/others

      # 4Sg/Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: wîcihimici	# when another/others help me
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: wîcihimiski	# when another/others help you
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: wîcihikoci	# when another/others help him/her
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: wîcihikothâhki	# when another/others help us
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: [wîcihikothahki, wîcihikothahko]	# when another/others help you and us
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: wîcihikothîko	# when another/others help you all
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: wîcihikotwâwi	# when another/others help them
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: wîcihâthici	# when another/others help yet another/others

      # 5Sg/Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihikothici	# when yet another/others help another/others

      # X
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+1SgO: wîcihikawithâni	# when someone helps me
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+2SgO: wîcihikawithani	# when someone helps you
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+3SgO: wîcihihci	# when someone helps him/her
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+1PlO: wîcihikawithâhki	# when someone helps us
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+12PlO: wîcihikawithahki	# when someone helps you and us
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+2PlO: wîcihikawithîko	# when someone helps you all
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+3PlO: wîcihihtwâwi	# when someone helps them
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+4Sg/PlO: wîcihimihci	# when someone helps another/others

      # 0Sg/Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+0Sg/Pl+1SgO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+0Sg/Pl+1SgO
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+0Sg/Pl+2SgO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+0Sg/Pl+2SgO
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+0Sg/Pl+3SgO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+0Sg/Pl+3SgO
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+0Sg/Pl+1PlO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+0Sg/Pl+1PlO
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+0Sg/Pl+12PlO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+0Sg/Pl+12PlO
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+0Sg/Pl+2PlO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+0Sg/Pl+2PlO
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+0Sg/Pl+3PlO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+0Sg/Pl+3PlO
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO
      

      # Imp # Imm

      # 2Sg
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO: wîcihin	# (you) help me now
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1PlO: wîcihinân	# (you) help us now
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: wîcih	# (you) help him/her now
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO: wîcihik	# (you) help them now

      # 12Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3SgO: wîcihâtân	# let you and us help him/her now
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3PlO: wîcihâtânik	# let you and us help them now

      # 2Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1SgO: wîcihik	# (you all) help me now
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1PlO: wîcihinân	# (you all) help us now
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO: wîcihihk	# (you all) help him/her now
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO: wîcihihkok	# (you all) help them now
      

      # Imp # Del

      # 2Sg
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1SgO: wîcihîhkan	# (you) help me later
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1PlO: wîcihîhkâhk	# (you) help us later
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO: wîcihâhkan	# (you) help him/her later
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO: wîcihâhkanik	# (you) help them later

      # 12Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO: wîcihâhkahk	# let you and us help him/her later
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO: wîcihâhkahkok	# let you and us help them later

      # 2Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1SgO: wîcihîhkîk	# (you all) help me later
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1PlO: wîcihîhkâhk	# (you all) help us later
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO: wîcihâhkîk	# (you all) help him/her later
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO: wîcihâhkîkok	# (you all) help them later
      
